en: Curler type: Flexi rods; Hot rollers; Other
es: Tipo de rizador: Varillas flexibles; Ruleros calientes; Otros
th: ประเภทที่ดัดผม: ที่ม้วนผมแบบไม่ใช้ความร้อน; ที่ม้วนผมแบบใช้ความร้อน; อื่นๆ
da: Krølletype: Flexi-stænger; Varme ruller; Andet
el: Τύπος συσκευής για μπούκλες: Εύκαμπτα ρόλεϊ μαλλιών; Θερμαινόμενα ρολά μαλλιών; Άλλο
vi: Loại dụng cụ uốn tóc: Thanh uốn tóc mềm; Lô uốn nóng; Khác
zh-TW: 捲髮器類型: 無熱捲髮器; 熱捲髮器; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta kodralnika: Penaste navijalke; Vroče navijalke; Drugo
ja: カーラータイプ: フレキシブルロッド; ホットローラー; その他
lt-LT: Plaukų sukimo žnyplių tipas: Lankstieji strypai; Karštieji voleliai; Kita
fr: Type de fer à boucler: Tiges flexibles; Rouleaux chauffants; Autre
sv: Typ av locktång: Flexi stavar; Varmvalsar; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de modelador: Rolos flexíveis; Rolos quentes; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta uvijača za kosu: Pjenasti štapići; Grijani uvijači; Ostalo
fi: Kiharrintyyppi: Taipuvat patukat; Kuumat rullat; Muu
nl: Krultangtype: Flexibele rollers; Warmterollers; Andere
pt-BR: Tipo de modelador: Hastes flexíveis; Babyliss; Outro
cs: Typ natáček: Pružné natáčky; Hot rollers; Jiné
nb: Krølltangtype: Flexistenger; Varme ruller; Annet
ro-RO: Tip bigudiuri: Bigudiuri flexibile; Bigudiuri electrice; Altele
de: Lockenwicklertyp: Flexwickler; Heißer Lockenwickler; Sonstiges
hu: Hajcsavaró típusa: Rugalmas rudak; Melegíthető hajcsavarók; Egyéb
it: Tipo di bigodino: Aste flessibili; Rulli caldi; Altro
ru: Тип бигудей: Гибкие стержни; Горячие ролики; Другое
zh-CN: 卷发器类型: 柔性棒; 加热卷发棒; 其他
pl: Typ lokówki: Pręty elastyczne; Gorące rolki; Inne
bg-BG: Тип маша: Флекси пръти; Горещи валяци; Други
sk-SK: Typ kulmy: Papilotové natáčky; Nahrievacie natáčky; Iné
ko: 헤어롤 유형: 플렉시 로드; 핫 롤러; 기타
tr: Kıvırıcı Tipi: Esnek çubuklar; Sıcak silindirler; Diğer